District of Columbia statutes.
47-2851.18

Participation of District agencies.

All departments and agencies of the District of Columbia government are hereby directed to provide full participation and cooperation in the implementation of this subchapter.

Apr. 20, 1999, D.C. Law 12-261, § 2002(l), 46 DCR 3142
1981 Ed., § 47-2851.18.
Short title of title II of D.C. Law 12-261: Section 2001 of D.C. Law 12-261 provided that title II of the act may be cited as the Business Regulatory Reform Act of 1998.